Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.300

Dogs or cats used as bait—Seizure—Limitation.

(1) If any person commits the crime of animal cruelty in the first or second degree by using or trapping to use domestic dogs or cats as bait, prey, or targets for the purpose of training dogs or other animals to track, fight, or hunt, law enforcement officers or animal control officers shall seize and hold the animals being trained. The seized animals shall be disposed of by the court pursuant to the provisions of RCW 16.52.200(3).

(2) This section shall not in any way interfere with or impair the operation of any provision of Title 28B RCW, relating to higher education or biomedical research.

[ 1994 c 261 s 15; 1990 c 226 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.